Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-764
Central administrator; appointment; powers.

Pursuant to said agreement, the Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to designate an officer or alternate who shall be the central administrator of and the information agent for the Agreement on Detainers and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party states, shall have power to formulate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms of the agreement, and shall serve subject to the pleasure of the Governor.

Laws 1963, c. 154, § 6, p. 552.